Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1293.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of May 28, 1937 (P.L.955, 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 No.265), known as the Housing Authorities Law, is amended to read:Section 2. Findings and Declaration of Policy.--It has been determined by the General Assembly of this Commonwealth, and it is hereby declared as a matter of legislative finding that--(a) There exists in urban and rural communities, within the various counties of this Commonwealth, numerous slums and unsafe, unsanitary, inadequate or overcrowded dwellings, which conditions are accompanied and aggravated by an acute shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings within the financial reach of persons of low income and persons of moderate income, such conditions arising from overcrowding, dilapidation, faulty construction, obsolete buildings, lack of proper light, air, and sanitary facilities.(b) The existence of any of the above enumerated conditions is prejudicial to the welfare of the people of this Commonwealth because such conditions--(1) encourage the spread of disease and impair public health and morals; (2) increase the hazards of fires, accidents, and other calamities which result in loss of life and property; (3) subject the moral standards of the people to bad influences which have permanent deleterious social effects; (4) increase the violation of the criminal laws of the Commonwealth so as to jeopardize the safety and well-being of the inhabitants thereof; (5) necessitate the expenditure of vast sums of public money, both by the Commonwealth and local governmental bodies, for the purpose of crime prevention, punishment, and correction, fire and accident prevention, public health service and relief.(c) The failure to remedy the acute dwelling shortage is directly related to the stagnation of business activity in the 20250HB1293PN1473 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction, durable goods, and allied industries which are conducted within this Commonwealth, and the stagnation of which has produced serious and prolonged unemployment, with all its injurious effects upon the welfare of the inhabitants of this Commonwealth.(d) Private industry alone has been and now is unable to overcome the obstacles which have prevented and are now preventing it from clearing slum areas and relieving the shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings for persons of low income and persons of moderate income, and the construction, pursuant to this act, of housing projects for persons of low income and persons of moderate income would therefore not be competitive with private enterprise.Therefore, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to promote the health and welfare of the inhabitants thereof by the creation of corporate and politic bodies to be known as housing authorities. The public purposes for which such authorities shall operate shall be--(1) the clearance, replanning, and reconstruction of the areas in which slums exist; (2) the providing of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income and persons of moderate income through new construction or the reconstruction, restoration, reconditioning, remodeling or repair of existing structures, so as to prevent recurrence of the economically and socially disastrous conditions hereinbefore described; and (3) the accomplishment of a combination of the foregoing. Such purposes are hereby declared to be public uses for which public money may be spent, and private property acquired by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.Section 2. Section 3(j) and (l.1) of the act are amended and 20250HB1293PN1473 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Definitions.--The following words, terms, and phrases, where used or referred to in this act, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(j) "Housing Project" or "Project." Any work or undertaking -- (1) To demolish, clear or remove buildings from any slum area, or to adapt such area to public purposes, including parks, playgrounds, swimming pools or other recreational or community purposes; or (2) to provide safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations by means of new construction, or the reconstruction, restoration, reconditioning, remodeling, or repair of existing structures for persons of low income or persons of moderate income, such work or undertaking may include buildings, land, equipment, facilities, and other real or personal property for necessary, convenient or desirable appurtenances, streets, sewers, water services, parks, site preparation, gardening, administrative, community, health, recreational, educational, welfare or other purposes; or (3) to accomplish a combination of the foregoing. The term "Housing Project" or "Project" may be applied to the planning of the buildings and improvements, the acquisition of property, the demolition of existing structures, the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair of existing improvements, and all other work in connection therewith.* * *(l.1) "Mixed-use Projects." Any project that includes a commercial, industrial, market-rate residential or retail 20250HB1293PN1473 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 component, and either-- (1) a low-income or moderate-income housing component; or (2) is within a two-mile radius of a [low-income] housing project owned, leased, either in the capacity of lessor or lessee, held or financed by an Authority.* * *(o.1) "Persons of Moderate Income." Persons or families whose income is not less than eighty per centum (80%) and not more than one hundred twenty per centum (120%) of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located.* * *Section 3. Sections 4(d), 10(b) and (c) and 13 of the act are amended to read:Section 4. Formation of Housing Authorities.--* * *(d) The governing body of any city or county or the Governor, as the case may be, shall declare that there is need for a housing authority to function within such city or county if and only if the said governing body or the Governor shall find, either that--(1) unsanitary or unsafe dwelling accommodations exist in said city or county; or that (2) there is a lack of sufficient, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations in said city or county available to persons of low income or persons of moderate income, and that this results in any of the conditions described in section two (b) and (c) of this act. In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or unsanitary, said governing body or the Governor, as the case may be, shall take into consideration the degree of overcrowding, the percentage of land coverage, the light, air space, and access available to the inhabitants of such dwelling accommodations, the size and arrangement of the rooms, the 20250HB1293PN1473 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sanitary facilities, and the extent to which conditions exist in such buildings, which endanger life, health or property by fire, disease or other causes.* * *Section 10. Powers of an Authority.--An Authority shall constitute a public body, corporate and politic, exercising public powers of the Commonwealth as an agency thereof, which powers shall include all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of this act, including the following powers, in addition to others herein granted:* * *(b) To determine where unsafe or unsanitary dwelling or housing conditions exist, or where there is a shortage of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income and persons of moderate income.(c) To study and make recommendations concerning the plan of any city or municipality located within the field of operation of the Authority in relation to the problem of clearing, replanning, and reconstructing areas in which unsafe or unsanitary dwelling or housing conditions exist, and the problem of providing dwelling accommodations for persons of low income and persons of moderate income.* * *Section 13. Establishment of Rentals and Selection of Tenants.--Subject to the preferences under section 13.2, an Authority may rent or lease dwelling accommodations only to persons of low income and persons of moderate income and at rentals within their financial reach. It may rent or lease to a tenant a dwelling consisting of the number of rooms (but no 20250HB1293PN1473 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 greater number) which it deems necessary to provide safe and sanitary accommodations to the proposed occupants thereof without overcrowding. It shall not accept any person as a tenant in any housing project if the person or persons, who would occupy the dwelling, have an aggregate annual income in excess of six times the annual rental of the quarters to be furnished such person or persons. In computing rental for the purpose of selecting tenants, there shall be included in the rental the average annual cost, as determined by the Authority, to the occupants of heat, water, electricity, gas, cooking range, and other necessary services or facilities, whether or not the charge for such services and facilities is in fact included in the rental. Every Authority shall file a schedule of its rental charges for dwelling accommodations with the State Planning Board.Nothing contained in this or the preceding section shall be construed as limiting the power of an Authority to vest in an obligee the right, in the event of a default by the Authority, to take possession of a housing project, or cause the appointment of a receiver thereof, or acquire title thereto through foreclosure proceedings, free from all the restrictions imposed by this or the preceding section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1293PN1473 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223